Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-736
Warrant of arrest; execution.

Such warrant shall authorize the peace officer or other person to whom directed to arrest the accused at any time and any place where he may be found within the state and to command the aid of all peace officers or other persons in the execution of the warrant, and to deliver the accused, subject to the provisions of sections 29-729 to 29-758 to the duly authorized agent of the demanding state.

Laws 1963, c. 159, § 8, p. 561.